Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-6] Venue. A child protective
proceeding under this chapter may be filed in the county in which a child is
found or resides when the petition is filed, or in the county in which a parent
having legal custody of the child resides or is domiciled when the petition is
filed. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next